query_api/transformations/transducers/nahuat/lexc/flex_orth.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>

LEXICON Root
Cns ;
Vow ;


LEXICON Loop
Cns ;
Vow ;
 #  ;


LEXICON Vow
oa:owa Loop ;
ia:iya Loop ;
owa:oa Loop ;
iya:ia Loop ;

i:i Loop ;
e:e Loop ;
a:a Loop ;
o:o Loop ;
u:u Loop ;

i:iʔ NonGlottalCns ;
e:eʔ NonGlottalCns ;
a:aʔ NonGlottalCns ;
o:oʔ NonGlottalCns ;

ē:ē Loop ;
ī:ī Loop ;
ā:ā Loop ;
ō:ō Loop ;

y:i Cns ;
y:i # ;

!
! Word-ending lenitions
!
iw:i # ;
aw:a # ;
ow:o # ;
ew:e # ;

in:i # ;
an:a # ;


LEXICON Cns
ʔ:ʔ Cns ;
ʔ:ʔ # ;
b:b Loop ;
s:s Loop ;
k:k Loop ;
kʷ:kʷ Loop ;
t͡ʃ:t͡ʃ Loop ;
d:d Loop ;
f:f Loop ;
g:g Loop ;
j:j Loop ;
ɬ:ɬ Loop ;
t:t Loop ;
m:m Loop ;

n:n Loop ;

!n:0 # ;
!m:0 # ;

p:p Loop ;
r:r Loop ;
ʃ:ʃ Loop ;

y:y Vow ;

l:l Loop ;
w:w Loop ;


LEXICON NonGlottalCns
b:b Loop ;
s:s Loop ;
k:k Loop ;
kʷ:kʷ Loop ;
t͡ʃ:t͡ʃ Loop ;
d:d Loop ;
f:f Loop ;
g:g Loop ;
j:j Loop ;
ɬ:ɬ Loop ;
t:t Loop ;
m:m Loop ;
n:n Loop ;
p:p Loop ;
r:r Loop ;
ʃ:ʃ Loop ;
y:y Vow ;
l:l Loop ;
w:w Loop ;
